pt-BR: Firmeza: Extra firme; Extra suave; Firme; Médio; Firmeza média; Médio suave; Macio; Outro
sl-SI: Trdota: Zelo čvrsta; Zelo mehka; Čvrsta; Srednja; Srednje čvrsta; Srednje mehka; Mehka; Drugo
pt-PT: Firmeza: Extra firme; Extramacio; Firme; Médio; Firmeza média; Suavidade média; Suave; Outro
ru: Жесткость: Очень твердый; Очень мягкий; Твердый; Средний; Средней твердости; Средней мягкости; Мягкий; Другой
nl: Stevigheid: Extra hard; Extra zacht; Stevig; Medium; Medium hard; Medium zacht; Zacht; Andere
fr: Fermeté: Extra ferme; Extra doux; Ferme; Moyen; Moyennement ferme; Moyennement doux; Doux; Autre
it: Solidità: Extra fermo; Extra morbido; Compatto; Medio; Medio fermo; Medio morbido; Morbido; Altro
vi: Độ cứng: Cực chắc; Cực mềm; Chắc; Vừa; Chắc vừa; Mềm vừa; Mềm; Khác
lt-LT: Kietumas: Itin tvirtas; Itin minkštas; Tvirtas; Vidutiniškas; Vidutinio tvirtumo; Vidutinio minkštumo; Minkštas; Kita
sv: Fasthet: Extra fast; Extra mjuk; Fast; Medium; Medium fast; Medium mjuk; Mjuk; Övrigt
th: ความแน่น: แน่นมาก; อ่อนนุ่มพิเศษ; แน่น; สื่อ; แน่นปานกลาง; นุ่มปานกลาง; นุ่ม; อื่นๆ
fi: Lujuus: Erittäin kiinteä; Erittäin pehmeä; Kiinteä; Keskimääräinen; Keskikiinteä; Keskipehmeä; Pehmeä; Muu
cs: Tuhost: Extra pevné; Extra měkký; Pevná; Médium; Středně pevné; Středně měkké; Měkká; Jiné
zh-TW: 硬度: 額外結實; 特軟; 結實; 媒介; 中等硬度; 中等柔軟; 柔軟; 其他
el: Σταθερότητα: Ιδιαίτερα έντονη; Εξαιρετικά μαλακό; Έντονη; Μέση; Μέτρια σταθερό; Μέτρια μαλακό; Μαλακό; Άλλο
nb: Fasthet: Ekstra fast; Ekstra myk; Fast; Middels; Middels fast; Middels myk; Myk; Annet
da: Fasthed: Ekstra fast; Ekstra blød; Fast; Medium; Medium fast; Medium blød; Blød; Andet
ko: 단단함: 매우 단단함; 매우 부드러움; 단단함; 매체; 약간 단단함; 약간 부드러움; 부드러움; 기타
ja: 硬さ: 超硬め; 超ソフト; 硬め; 媒体; 中程度硬め; 中程度ソフト; ソフト; その他
hr-HR: Razina tvrdoće: Ekstra čvrsto; Ekstra meko; Čvrsto; Srednje; Srednje čvrsto; Srednje meko; Meko; Ostalo
tr: Sıkılık: Ekstra sert; Ekstra yumuşak; Katı; Orta; Orta sert; Orta yumuşak; Yumuşak; Diğer
es: Firmeza: Extrafirme; Extrasuave; Firme; Medio; Medianamente firme; Medio blando; Blando; Otros
bg-BG: Твърдост: Изключително твърд; Изключително мек; Твърд; Среден; Средно твърд; Средно мек; Мек; Други
ro-RO: Fermitate: Extra ferm; Extra moale; Ferm; Mediu; Mediu ferm; Mediu moale; Moale; Altele
sk-SK: Tvrdosť: Extra pevný; Extra jemný; Pevný; Stredný; Stredne pevný; Stredne mäkký; Mäkký; Iné
zh-CN: 坚固度: 特硬; 特软; 结实; 媒介; 中硬; 中软; 软; 其他
en: Firmness: Extra firm; Extra soft; Firm; Medium; Medium firm; Medium soft; Soft; Other
pl: Jędrność: Bardzo sztywny; Bardzo miękki; Stałe; Środek; Średnio sztywny; Średnio miękki; Miękki; Inne
de: Härte: Extra fest; Extra weich; Kräftig; Medium; Mittelfest; Mittelweich; Weich; Sonstiges
hu: Keménység: Extra kemény; Extra puha; Kemény; Közepes; Közepesen kemény; Közepesen puha; Puha; Egyéb